District of Columbia statutes.
2-1508

Conflict of interest procedures.

The neighborhood planning councils shall, with the assistance of the Department of Recreation, establish procedures in their bylaws and constitution to handle conflicts of interest in the award of subgrants to programs, when any councilmember has either a structural or fiduciary relationship with a grant applicant or grantee.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 9, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2608.
1973 Ed., § 6-2008.

References in Text

Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”